nb: Fjernteknologi: Bluetooth; Infrarød; Mobilenhet; Radio; Bundet; Wi-Fi; Kablet; Trådløs; Annet
it: Tecnologia remota: Bluetooth; Infrarossi; Dispositivo mobile; Radio; Tethered; Wi-Fi; Cablata; Senza fili; Altro
vi: Công nghệ điều khiển từ xa: Bluetooth; Hồng ngoại; Thiết bị di động; Radio; Đã nối; Wi-Fi; Có kết nối dây; Không dây; Khác
th: เทคโนโลยีรีโมต: บลูทูธ; อินฟราเรด; อุปกรณ์มือถือ; วิทยุ; เชื่อมต่อ; Wi-Fi; แบบมีสาย; แบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
fi: Etäteknologia: Bluetooth; Infrapuna; Mobiililaite; Radio; Suorakuvattu; Wi-Fi; Langallinen; Langattomat; Muu
ja: 遠隔技術: Bluetooth; 赤外線; モバイルデバイス; 無線機; テザー; Wi-Fi; 有線; 無線; その他
ko: 원격 기술: Bluetooth; 적외선; 모바일 기기; 라디오; 테더드; Wi-Fi; 유선; 무선; 기타
cs: Technologie ovládání na dálku: Bluetooth; Infračervená; Mobilní zařízení; Rádio; Připojené; Wi-Fi; Kabelové; Bezdrátové; Jiné
pl: Technologia zdalna: Bluetooth; Podczerwień; Urządzenie mobilne; Radio; Połączone przez tethering; Wi-Fi; Przewodowy; Bezprzewodowy; Inne
el: Τεχνολογία εξ αποστάσεως: Bluetooth; Υπέρυθρες; Κινητή συσκευή; Ραδιοσύνδεση; Πρόσδεση; Wi-Fi; Ενσύρματη; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tecnologia remota: Bluetooth; Infravermelho; Dispositivo móvel; Rádio; Tethered; Wi-Fi; Com fios; Sem fios; Outro
hr-HR: Tehnologija upravljanja na daljinu: Bluetooth; Infracrveno; Mobilni uređaj; Radio; Vezano; Wi-Fi; Žičana; Bežična; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tehnologie telecomandă: Bluetooth; Infraroșu; Dispozitiv mobil; Radio; Tethered; Wi-Fi; Cablat; Fără sârmă; Altele
bg-BG: Дистанционна технология: Bluetooth; Инфрачервена; Мобилно устройство; Радио; С тетъринг; Wi-Fi; С кабел; Безжична; Други
es: Tecnología remota: Bluetooth; Infrarrojo; Dispositivo móvil; Radio; Conectado; Wi-Fi; Cableado; Inalámbrico; Otros
pt-BR: Tecnologia remota: Bluetooth; Infravermelho; Dispositivo móvel; Rádio; Tirante; Wi-Fi; Com fio; Sem fio; Outro
fr: Technologie à distance: Bluetooth; Infrarouge; Appareil mobile; Radio; Attaché; Wi-Fi; Filaire; Sans fil; Autre
en: Remote technology: Bluetooth; Infrared; Mobile device; Radio; Tethered; Wi-Fi; Wired; Wireless; Other
sk-SK: Vzdialená technológia: Bluetooth; Infračervený; Mobilné zariadenie; Rádio; Spojený káblom; Wi-Fi; Drôtový; Bezdrôtový; Iné
nl: Technologie op afstand: Bluetooth; Infrarood; Mobiel apparaat; Radio; Gekoppeld; Wifi; Bedraad; Draadloos; Andere
tr: Uzaktan teknoloji: Bluetooth; Kızılötesi; Mobil cihaz; Radyo; Bağlı; Wi-Fi; Kablolu; Kablosuz; Diğer
lt-LT: Nuotolinio valdymo technologija: „Bluetooth“; Infraraudonieji spinduliai; Mobilusis įrenginys; Radijas; Susietas; Wi-Fi; Laidinis; Belaidis; Kita
zh-TW: 遠端技術: 藍牙; 紅外線; 行動裝置; 收音機; 系連的; Wi-Fi; 有線; 無線; 其他
sl-SI: Tehnologija na daljavo: Bluetooth; Infrardeča; Mobilna naprava; Radio; Privezan; Wi-Fi; Žična; Brezžično; Drugo
zh-CN: 遥控技术: 蓝牙; 红外; 移动设备; 收音机; 系留; Wi-Fi; 有线; 无线; 其他
da: Fjernteknologi: Bluetooth; Infrarød; Mobilenhed; Radio; Forbundet; Wi-Fi; Kablet; Trådløs; Andet
sv: Fjärrteknik: Bluetooth; Infraröd; Mobil enhet; Radio; Kabelanslutning; Wi-Fi; Trådbunden; Trådlös; Övrigt
ru: Технология удаленного управления: Bluetooth; Инфракрасный; Мобильное устройство; Радио; По проводу; Wi-Fi; Проводное; Беспроводная; Другое
hu: Távvezérlési technológia: Bluetooth; Infravörös; Mobil eszköz; Rádió; Megosztott; Wi-Fi; Vezetékes; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
de: Fernsteuerungstechnologie: Bluetooth; Infrarot; Mobilgerät; Radio; Tethered; Wi-Fi; Kabelgebunden; Kabellos; Sonstiges